Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB222.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 224.80-190 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, an environmental covenant may be amended or
terminated by consent only if the amendment or termination is requested as a modification to the
corrective action plan approved by the cabinet, and only if the amendment or termination is signed by:
1.[(a)] The cabinet;
2.[(b)] The current owner of the fee simple of the real property subject to the covenant;
3.[(c)] Each person that originally signed the environmental covenant or that person's heirs, assigns, or
transferees unless:
a.[1.] The person or the person's heirs, assigns, or transferees waived in a signed document the
right to consent; or
b.[2.] A court finds that the person no longer exists or cannot be located or identified with the
exercise of reasonable diligence; and
4.[(d)] The holder, except as otherwise provided in subsection (4)(b) of this section.
(b) The consent of a holder or of persons identified in paragraph (a)3. of this subsection shall not be
required for an amendment that has the sole effect of removing or reducing a land use restriction in
an environmental covenant, if the cabinet determines that the restriction is no longer necessary to
protect human health or the environment as a result of corrective action performed under a plan
approved by the cabinet, and the requirements of subsection (6) of this section have been satisfied.
(2) If an interest in real property is subject to an environmental covenant, the interest shall not be affected by an
amendment of the environmental covenant unless:
(a) The current owner of the interest consents to the amendment; or
(b) The current owner of the interest has waived in a signed record the right to consent to the amendments.
(3) Except for an assignment undertaken pursuant to a governmental reorganization, assignment of an
environmental covenant to a new holder shall be deemed an amendment of the environmental covenant.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in an environmental covenant:
(a) A holder may not assign its interest without consent of the other parties to the environmental covenant
specified in subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) A holder may be removed and replaced by agreement of the other parties specified in subsection (1) of
this section.
(5) A court of competent jurisdiction may fill a vacancy in the position of the holder.
(6) (a) When the cabinet determines that corrective action performed under a cabinet-approved plan has
eliminated the environmental conditions necessitating a land use restriction in an environmental
covenant, the cabinet shall issue a proposed determination authorizing the amendment of the
covenant to remove or reduce the restriction.
(b) The cabinet shall provide written notice of the proposed determination and the proposed amended
covenant to the holder and to all persons identified in subsection (1)(a)2. and 3. of this section. The
notice shall advise recipients that any objection to the proposed amended covenant must be filed with
the cabinet within thirty (30) days of receipt and must state in writing with reasonable specificity the
legal or technical basis for maintaining the restriction.
(c) If no objection is submitted within thirty (30) days, the cabinet shall issue a final determination
approving the amendment, and the amendment shall be effective upon recordation.
Legislative Research Commission PDF Version

2 ACTS OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY
(d) If a timely objection is submitted, the cabinet shall consider the objection and issue a final written
determination within forty-five (45) days of the receipt of the objection. The cabinet's final
determination shall approve, modify, or deny the proposed amendment.
(e) Once the cabinet's final determination has been made, the objector shall have thirty (30) days to seek
judicial review of the final determination by filing an action in the Franklin Circuit Court. In the
proceeding, the burden shall be on the objector to demonstrate that the removal or reduction of the
restriction would adversely affect human health or the environment. If the objector is unsuccessful in
the proceeding, the proposed amendment shall be effective upon recordation.
(f) If no action for judicial review is filed within thirty (30) days of the cabinet's final determination, the
right to challenge the proposed amendment shall be waived and the proposed amendment shall be
effective upon recordation.
Section 2. KRS 224.80-180 is amended to read as follows:
(1) An environmental covenant shall be perpetual, except under the following circumstances:
(a) By its terms, the environmental covenant is limited to a specific duration or is terminated by the
occurrence of a specific event;
(b) The environmental covenant is terminated pursuant to KRS 224.80-190;
(c) The environmental covenant is terminated by foreclosure of an interest that has priority over the
environmental covenant;[ or]
(d) The environmental covenant is terminated or modified in an eminent domain proceeding and the
following conditions exist:
1. The cabinet is a party to the eminent domain proceeding;
2. All persons identified in KRS 224.80-190(1) and (2) are given notice of the pendency of the
eminent domain proceeding; and
3. A court of competent jurisdiction determines, after hearing, that the termination or modification
of the environmental covenant will not adversely affect human health or the environment; or
(e) The environmental covenant is amended to remove or reduce a land use restriction pursuant to
Section 1 of this Act, and further court approval is not required.
(2) If the cabinet or if any holder determines that the intended benefits of an environmental covenant can no
longer be realized, Franklin Circuit Court, under the doctrine of changed circumstances, in an action in which
all persons identified in KRS 224.80-190(1) and (2) have been given notice, may terminate the environmental
covenant or reduce its burden on the real property subject to the environmental covenant.
(3) Except as otherwise provided in subsections (1) and (2) of this section, an environmental covenant may not be
extinguished, limited, or impaired through the issuance of a tax deed, foreclosure of a tax lien, or application
of the doctrine of adverse possession, prescription, abandonment, waiver, lack of enforcement, acquiescence,
or a similar doctrine.
Section 3. The provisions of Sections 1 and 2 of this Act shall apply to all environmental covenants
recorded pursuant to KRS 224.80-100 to 224.80-210, including those recorded prior to the effective date of this Act.
Section 4. Whereas it is critical that an efficient procedure be established for the timely removal of land
use restrictions in environmental covenants that have been deemed no longer necessary so that the affected land can
be put to its highest and best use as soon as possible, an emergency is declared to exist, and this Act takes effect upon
its passage and approval by the Governor or upon its otherwise becoming a law.
Signed by Governor April 8, 2026.